incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="ne/alko__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alka</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alku</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alko</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alku</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alko</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alkom</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alko</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>álk</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alkám</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alká</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alkách</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alká</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alkami</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alká</l>
        <r>alko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jab/lko__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lka</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lku</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lko</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lku</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lko</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lkom</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lko</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ĺk</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lkám</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lká</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lkách</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lká</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lkami</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lká</l>
        <r>lko<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="esejist/a__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ovi</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>om</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ov</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>och</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kal/ika__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ík</l>
        <r>ika<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ika<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ik</l>
        <r>ika<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>liek</l>
        <r>ľka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľk</l>
        <r>ľka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľk</l>
        <r>ľka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pom/lka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ĺk</l>
        <r>lka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lk</l>
        <r>lka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lk</l>
        <r>lka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/uka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úk</l>
        <r>uka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uk</l>
        <r>uka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uk</l>
        <r>uka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="reb/eka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iek</l>
        <r>eka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>eka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ek</l>
        <r>eka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/anka__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aniek</l>
        <r>anka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ánk</l>
        <r>anka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ank</l>
        <r>anka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ank</l>
        <r>anka<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="akustika"><i>akust</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artista"><i>artist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atletika"><i>atlet</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="azbuka"><i>azb</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banka"><i>b</i><par n="b/anka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="botanika"><i>botan</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buldozerista"><i>buldozerist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cestovateľka"><i>cestovate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deka"><i>d</i><par n="reb/eka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dorábateľka"><i>dorábate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drogérista"><i>drogérist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dynamika"><i>dynam</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrotechnika"><i>elektrotechn</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etika"><i>et</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fejtonista"><i>fejtonist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gitarista"><i>gitarist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gymnastika"><i>gymnast</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hanobiteľka"><i>hanobite</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imperialista"><i>imperialist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jablko"><i>jab</i><par n="jab/lko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karavanista"><i>karavanist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klika"><i>kl</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrabasista"><i>kontrabasist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kľuka"><i>kľ</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liečiteľka"><i>liečite</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="logika"><i>log</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muka"><i>m</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mafista"><i>mafist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motorika"><i>motor</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motorista"><i>motorist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mravouka"><i>mravo</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="narušiteľka"><i>narušite</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nealko"><i>ne</i><par n="ne/alko__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obyvateľka"><i>obyvate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odluka"><i>odl</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odmlka"><i>odm</i><par n="pom/lka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okultista"><i>okultist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okľuka"><i>okľ</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opuka"><i>op</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panika"><i>pan</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paseka"><i>pas</i><par n="reb/eka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pingpongista"><i>pingpongist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poberateľka"><i>poberate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pomlka"><i>pom</i><par n="pom/lka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ponuka"><i>pon</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="posudzovateľka"><i>posudzovate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pretvárateľka"><i>pretvárate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="psychika"><i>psych</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ruka"><i>r</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rebeka"><i>reb</i><par n="reb/eka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="revizionista"><i>revizionist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozluka"><i>rozl</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rétorika"><i>rétor</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="suka"><i>s</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samoplatiteľka"><i>samoplatite</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sluka"><i>sl</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spoluriešiteľka"><i>spoluriešite</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tabelista"><i>tabelist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tabuľka"><i>tabu</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telemechanika"><i>telemechan</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vierouka"><i>viero</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voliteľka"><i>volite</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zapisovateľka"><i>zapisovate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zvolávateľka"><i>zvolávate</i><par n="spoluobyvate/ľka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šamanista"><i>šamanist</i><par n="esejist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šlamastika"><i>šlamast</i><par n="kal/ika__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štuka"><i>št</i><par n="m/uka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štreka"><i>štr</i><par n="reb/eka__n"/></e>
